Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2889. A. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of


this title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as


provided in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same


as other real property therein, except that each homestead, as


defined by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted


from all forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) of the assessed valuation for tax years 1988


through 2026, and Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for tax year 2027


and subsequent tax years.

Req. No. 2354 Page 1


B. In addition to the exemption provided for in subsection A of


this section, for tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, homesteads


exempt from ad valorem taxation pursuant to this section shall be


further exempted from all forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent


of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) of the assessed valuation if


the following conditions are satisfied:


1. For the prior tax year, the county excise board in the


county where the homestead is located certifies that ad valorem


revenue collections exceeded the collections from the preceding tax


year by at least five percent (5%); and


2. The board of county commissioners in the county where the


homestead is located, upon receipt of a certification made pursuant


to paragraph 1 of this subsection, approves the additional exemption


provided for in this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2354 QD 1/15/2026 9:37:37 AM















Req. No. 2354 Page 2